Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-5650
Act, how cited.

Sections 71-5650 to 71-5670 shall be known and may be cited as the Rural Health Systems and Professional Incentive Act.

Laws 1991, LB 400, § 1.